Missouri, session 2026, SB1107.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 42, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 42.028, to read as
follows:
42.028. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Compensation", payment of any money, thing of
value, or financial benefit;
(2) "Person", an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation,
government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
The term "person" shall not include the Missouri veterans'
commission;
(3) "Veterans benefits matter", the preparation,
presentation, or prosecution of any claim affecting any
person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim
for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function,
status, or entitlement to which is determined under the laws
and regulations administered by the United States Department

SB 1107 2
of Veterans Affairs or the Missouri veterans' commission,
pertaining to veterans, their dependents, their survivors,
and any other individual eligible for such benefits.
2. Except as permitted under federal law, no person
shall receive compensation for advising or assisting any
individual with regard to any veterans benefits matter.
3. No person shall receive compensation for referring
any individual to another person to advise or assist this
individual with any veterans benefits matter.
4. A person seeking to receive compensation for
advising or assisting any individual with any veterans
benefits matter shall, before rendering any services,
memorialize all terms regarding the individual's payment of
fees for services rendered in a written agreement, signed by
both parties, that adheres to all criteria specified within
38 CFR 14.636.
5. No person shall receive any compensation for any
services rendered before the date on which a notice of
disagreement is filed with respect to the individual's case.
6. No person shall guarantee, either directly or by
implication, that any individual is certain to receive
specific veterans benefits or that any individual is certain
to receive a specific level, percentage, or amount of
veterans benefits.
7. No person shall receive excessive or unreasonable
fees as compensation for advising or assisting any
individual with any veterans benefits matter. The factors
articulated within 38 CFR 14.636 shall govern determinations
of whether a fee is excessive or unreasonable.
8. (1) No person shall advise or assist for
compensation any individual concerning any veterans benefits
matter without clearly providing, at the outset of the

SB 1107 3
business relationship, the following disclosure, both orally
and in writing:
"This business is not sponsored by, or
affiliated with, the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or the Missouri Veterans'
Commission, or any other federally chartered
veterans service organization. Other
organizations, including, but not limited to,
the Missouri Veterans' Commission, your local
veterans service agency, and other federally
chartered veterans service organizations, may be
able to provide you with this service free of
charge. Products or services offered by this
business are not necessarily endorsed by any of
these organizations. You may qualify for other
veterans benefits beyond the benefits for which
you are receiving services here.".
(2) The written disclosure shall appear in at least
twelve-point font and shall appear in a readily noticeable
and identifiable place in the person's agreement with the
individual seeking services. The individual shall verbally
acknowledge understanding of the oral disclosure and shall
sign the document in which the written disclosure appears,
to represent understanding of these provisions. The person
offering services shall retain a copy of the written
disclosure while providing veterans benefits services for
compensation to the individual and for at least one year
after the date on which the service relationship terminates.
9. (1) No person shall advertise for-compensation
services in veterans benefits matters without including the
following disclosure:

SB 1107 4
"This business is not sponsored by, or
affiliated with, the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or the Missouri Veterans'
Commission, or any other federally chartered
veterans service organization. Other
organizations, including, but not limited to,
the Missouri Veterans' Commission, your local
veterans service agency, and other federally
chartered veterans service organizations, may be
able to provide you with these services free of
charge. Products or services offered by this
business are not necessarily endorsed by any of
these organizations. You may qualify for other
veterans benefits beyond the services that this
business offers.".
(2) If the advertisement is printed, including, but
not limited to, advertisements visible to internet users,
the disclosure shall appear in a readily visible place on
the advertisement. If the advertisement is verbal, the
100 spoken statement of the disclosure shall be clear and
101 intelligible.
102 10. Any person who violates this section is guilty of
103 a class A misdemeanor.
✓